Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 4. Directors

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks and Financial Institutions §§ 329 to 476.

9 C.J.S Banks and Banking §§ 97 to 126.

§ 13-2-401.
Authority to manage banks; qualifications.

The affairs of a bank shall be managed by not less than five (5) directors. Shareholders or the board of directors if provided by the articles of incorporation may adopt and amend bylaws for the management of the bank. Each director shall take an oath that he will faithfully and diligently perform the duties of his office and will not violate or knowingly permit the violation of any of the laws of this state relating to the banking business. Within thirty (30) days after being elected or appointed each director of a bank shall sign the oath required by this section on a form prescribed by the commissioner and it shall be part of the record of the meeting and included in the bank’s minutes. Within thirty (30) days after initially being elected or appointed each director of a bank shall file with the commissioner a sworn financial statement on a form prescribed by the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 19; R.S. 1931, § 10-119; C.S. 1945, § 35-120; W.S. 1957, § 13-49; Laws 1963, ch. 161, § 1; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1981, ch. 21, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1998, ch. 64, § 1; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
substituted “sign the oath required by this section on a form
prescribed by the commissioner and it shall be part of the record
of the meeting and included in the bank's minutes” for “file
with the state banking commissioner the oath required by this section
and” in the third sentence, and added “Within thirty
(30) days after initially being elected or appointed each director
of a bank shall file with the commissioner” in the last sentence.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Authority of bank director to endorse and transfer commercial paper, 37 ALR2d 453.

§ 13-2-402.
Election; term; vacancies; number.

The initial and elected directors of any bank shall hold office for one (1) year and until their successors are elected and qualified except in cases of death, resignation or removal under the laws of this state. All elections shall be held annually on a day designated by the directors on or before April 30.

If the annual election of directors is not held at the time designated an election may be held within sixty (60) days thereafter following notice by publication in three (3) consecutive issues of a weekly newspaper printed in the county in which the bank is located, or if no newspaper is printed in the county then in a newspaper of general circulation in the state.

Any director who during his tenure as a director becomes insolvent or makes a general assignment of his property for the benefit of creditors shall vacate his office.

Vacancies which reduce the board to less than five (5) members shall be filled within ninety (90) days of the vacancy by appointment by the remaining directors for the unexpired term. The board shall notify the banking commissioner of any vacancy on the board within thirty (30) days of the vacancy.

Changes in the number of directors shall be authorized by a majority vote of the stockholders to be effective upon expiration of the current corporate year. The change may become effective immediately with the consent of the directors and written notification to the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 20, 22; 1931, ch. 112, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-120, 10-122; Laws 1945, ch. 18, § 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-121, 35-123; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-50, 13-53; Laws 1959, ch. 13, § 1; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1983, ch. 23, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1998, ch. 64, § 1.

§ 13-2-403.
Meetings; record of proceedings and business.

The board of directors of a bank shall hold a regular meeting every quarter of the calendar year. At each meeting a detailed report showing every loan and investment in excess of one percent (1%) of the bank’s capital and surplus made since the last report and the aggregate liability, direct or contingent, to the bank of each officer and director shall be submitted. The board of directors shall review the report and make it a part of the record of the meeting. The record shall show their approval or disapproval of the report.

A record of the proceedings and business of all meetings shall be included in the bank’s minutes. The record shall show the gross earnings of the bank and their disposition by indicating expenses and taxes paid, worthless items charged off, depreciation in assets, amount carried to surplus fund and amount of dividend and amount of undivided profits remaining.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 21, 25; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-121, 10-125; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-122, 35-126; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-51, 13-55; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1.

§ 13-2-404.
Liability.

Any director who participates in or consents to any action of a bank in making loans in excess of or contrary to law or regulations shall be liable in his individual capacity for damages proximately sustained by the bank, its stockholders or other persons.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 35b; R.S. 1931, § 10-137; C.S. 1945, § 35-140; W.S. 1957, § 13-56; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to director's criminal liability, see chapter 10 of this title.

Failure to know bank's condition. —

State bank directors' failure to know of condition of bank is not intentional or knowing violation of statute so as to make them personally liable for loss, unless failure arises from deliberate or reckless conduct. Webb v. Cash, 35 Wyo. 398, 250 P. 1,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1926).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of director of bank for losses on bad loans, 11 ALR Fed 606.

Liability, under National Banking Act (12 USC § 93), of national bank directors for retaliation against officer or employee who discloses or refuses to commit banking irregularity, 101 ALR Fed 377.

Construction and application of 18 USC § 215, punishing receipt or offering of commissions or gifts by or to bank officer for procuring loans, 114 ALR Fed 487.

Standard of liability applicable to action against directors or officers of failed depository institution pursuant to 12 USC § 1821(k), 125 ALR Fed 435.

§ 13-2-405.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 46, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 22, related to banking examining committees.